Hawaii statutes.
[§436B-25] Judicial review by circuit
court. Any person aggrieved by a final decision and order of the board in
a "contested case", as defined in chapter 91, is entitled to judicial
review thereof by the circuit court of the circuit in which the board making
the final decision and order has jurisdiction. The review shall be as provided
by chapter 91. [L 1991, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next